Rhode Island, session 2025, SB816.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 17 of the General Laws entitled "ELECTIONS" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 30
DECEPTIVE AND FRAUDULENT SYNTHETIC MEDIA IN ELECTION
COMMUNICATIONS
17-30-1. Deceptive synthetic media.
(a) For purposes of this chapter, “candidate” means and includes an incumbent or current
office holder.
(b) For purposes of this chapter, “synthetic media” means an image, an audio recording, or
a video recording of an individual’s appearance, speech, or conduct that has been intentionally
manipulated with the use of generative adversarial network techniques or other digital technology
to create a realistic but false image, audio, or video that produces:
(1) A depiction that, to a reasonable individual, appears to be a real individual in terms of
appearance, action, or speech, but that did not occur in reality; and
(2) A fundamentally different understanding or impression of the appearance, action, or
speech than a reasonable person would have from the unaltered, original version of the image, audio
recording, or video recording.
(c) A candidate, authorized candidate campaign committee, political action committee,

political party committee, or person or entity making an independent expenditure as defined in §
17-25-3 shall not, within ninety (90) days of any election at which a candidate for elective office
will appear on a ballot, distribute synthetic media that the candidate, authorized candidate campaign
committee, political action committee, political party committee, or person or entity making an
independent expenditure as defined in § 17-25-3 knows or should know is deceptive and fraudulent
synthetic media, as defined in subsection (b) of this section.
(d)(1) The prohibition in subsection (c) of this section does not apply if the image, audio
recording, or video recording includes a disclosure stating that the image has been manipulated or
generated by artificial intelligence.
(2) For visual media, the text of the disclosure shall appear in a size that is easily readable
by the average viewer, and no smaller than the largest font size of any other text appearing in the
visual media. If the visual media does not include any other text, the disclosure shall appear in a
size that is easily readable by the average viewer. For visual media that is a video, the disclosure
shall appear for the duration of the video.
(3) If the media consists of audio only, and no visual disclosure is feasible, the disclosure
shall be read in a clearly spoken manner, and in a speed and pitch that can be easily heard by the
average listener, at the beginning of the audio, at the end of the audio, and, if the audio is greater
than two (2) minutes in length, interspersed within the audio at intervals of not greater than two (2)
minutes.
17-30-2. Right of action.
(a) A candidate whose appearance, actions, or speech are depicted through the use of
synthetic media in violation of § 17-30-1 may seek injunctive or other equitable relief from a
candidate, authorized candidate campaign committee, political action committee, political party
committee, or person or entity making an independent expenditure as defined in § 17-25-3
prohibiting the distribution of audio or visual synthetic media in violation of this chapter.
(b) A candidate whose appearance, actions, or speech are depicted using synthetic media
may also bring an action for general or special damages against a candidate, authorized candidate
campaign committee, political action committee, political party committee, or person or entity
making an independent expenditure as defined in § 17-25-3 that generated the synthetic media. The
court may also award a prevailing party reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs. This subsection shall
not be construed to limit or preclude a plaintiff from recovering under any other available remedy.
(c) In any civil action alleging a violation of this chapter, the plaintiff shall bear the burden
of establishing the violation through clear and convincing evidence.
17-30-3. Application.
LC002300/SUB A - Page 2 of 4

(a) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the following:
(1) A radio or television broadcasting station, including a cable or satellite television
operator and their affiliates, programmer, or producer, or mobile application or streaming service
that exhibits, distributes, or broadcasts synthetic media as prohibited by this chapter provided that
they are not distributing synthetic media as a political action committee or entity making an
independent expenditure as defined in § 17-25-3;
(2) An Internet website, or a regularly published newspaper, magazine, or other periodical
of general circulation, including an Internet or electronic publication, that routinely carries news
and commentary of general interest, and that publishes synthetic media as prohibited by this
chapter, if the publication clearly states that the synthetic media does not accurately represent the
speech or conduct of the candidate;
(3) Synthetic media that constitutes satire or parody; or
(4) An interactive computer service as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 230.
(b) The provisions of this chapter shall not restrict the ability of a person to detect, prevent,
respond to, or protect against security incidents, identity theft, fraud, harassment, malicious or
deceptive activities, or any illegal activity, or preserve the integrity or security of systems or
investigate, report, or prosecute those responsible for any such action.
17-30-4. Severability.
The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its
application is held to be invalid, such holding shall not affect other provisions or applications that
can be given effect without the invalid provision.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002300/SUB A
========
LC002300/SUB A - Page 3 of 4